fr: Système de came: Binaire; Double; Hybrid; Unique; Autre
pt-BR: Sistema de câmeras: Binário; Dual; Híbrida; Único; Outro
pl: System krzywki: Binarny; Dual; Hybrydowy; Singiel; Inne
sl-SI: Cam sistem: Binarno; Dvojno; Hibrid; Enojni; Drugo
zh-TW: 攝影機系統: 二進位; 雙重; 混合; 單倍; 其他
bg-BG: Система на камерата: Двоична; Двойна; Хибрид; Единична; Други
fi: Kamerajärjestelmä: Binääri; Kaksiosainen; Hybridi; Yksittäinen; Muu
da: Kamerasystem: Binært; Dobbelt; Hybrid; Enkelt; Andet
hr-HR: Sustav brijega: Binarni; Dvojni; Hibridni; Jednostruki; Ostalo
tr: Kamera sistemi: İkili; Çift; Hibrit; Tek; Diğer
ro-RO: Sistem de came: Binary; Dual; Hibrid; Simplu; Altele
hu: Camrendszer: Bináris; Kettős; Hibrid; Egykamerás; Egyéb
nb: Kamsystem: Binær; Dobbel; Hybrid; Enkel; Annet
ru: Конструкция блоков: Двоичный; Двойной; Гибридный; Одинарный; Другой
es: Sistema de levas: Binario; Doble; Híbrido; Individual; Otros
ko: 캠 시스템: 바이너리; 듀얼; 하이브리드; 싱글; 기타
th: ระบบลูกเบี้ยว: ไบนารี่; คู่; แบบไฮบริด; แบบเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Vačkový systém: Binárny; Dvojitý; Hybridný; Jeden; Iné
lt-LT: Skriemulių sistema: Dvejetainė; Dviguba; Hibridinė; Single; Kita
nl: CAM-systeem: Binair; Dubbel; Hybride; Single; Andere
de: Kamerasystem: Binär; Zwei; Hybrid; Einzel; Sonstiges
ja: カムシステム: バイナリ; デュアル; ハイブリッド; シングル; その他
el: Σύστημα εκκέντρου: Δυαδικός; Διπλός; Hybrid; Μονό; Άλλο
zh-CN: 凸轮系统: 二元凸轮; 双温区; 混合型; 单; 其他
it: Sistema a camme: Binario; Doppie; Ibrido; Singolo; Altro
sv: Kamsystem: Binär; Dubbel; Hybrid; Enkel; Övrigt
cs: Kamerový systém: Binární; Duální; Hybridní; Jedna funkce; Jiné
vi: Hệ thống cam: Nhị phân; Hai nhiệt độ; Ván kết hợp; Đơn; Khác
en: Cam system: Binary; Dual; Hybrid; Single; Other
pt-PT: Sistema de câmara: Binário; Duplo; Híbrido; Único; Outro